Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.02
Trails; procedures.

Sections 2-3234.02 to 2-3234.09 are procedures for the use of eminent domain by a natural resources district to take private real property for a trail.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 1.